Idaho statutes. Title 20 STATE PRISON AND COUNTY JAILS
Chapter 5 JUVENILE CORRECTIONS ACT
§ 20-511. Diversion or informal disposition of the petition.

Prior to the filing of any petition under this act, the prosecuting attorney may request a preliminary inquiry from the county probation officer to determine whether the interest of the public or the juvenile requires a formal court proceeding. If court action is not required, the prosecuting attorney may utilize the diversion process and refer the case directly to the county probation officer or a community-based diversion program for informal probation and counseling. If the diversion process is utilized pursuant to this subsection, then statements made by a juvenile in a diversion proceeding shall be inadmissible at an adjudicative proceeding on the underlying charge as substantive evidence of guilt. If community service is going to be utilized pursuant to this subsection, the prosecuting attorney shall collect a fee of sixty cents (60¢) per hour for each hour of community service work the juvenile is going to perform and remit the fee to the state insurance fund for the purpose of securing worker’s compensation insurance for the juvenile offender performing community service. However, if a county is self-insured and provides worker’s compensation insurance for persons performing community service pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, then remittance to the state insurance fund is not required.

After the petition has been filed and where the juvenile offender admits to the allegations contained in the petition, the court may decide to make an informal adjustment of the petition. Informal adjustment includes, but is not limited to:

Reprimand of the juvenile offender;

Informal supervision with the probation department;

Community service work;

Restitution to the victim;

Participation in a community-based diversion program.

The court shall dismiss the case if:

An informal adjustment has been granted and the juvenile offender has satisfied the terms or conditions of the informal adjustment;

The court is convinced by the showing made that there is no longer cause for continuing the period of informal adjustment; and

It is compatible with the public interest.

Information uniquely identifying the juvenile offender, the offense, and the type of program utilized shall be forwarded to the department. This information shall be maintained by the department in a statewide juvenile offender information system. Access to the information shall be controlled by the department, subject to the provisions of section 74-113, Idaho Code.

Such informal adjustment of the petition shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Idaho juvenile rules. When an informal adjustment is made pursuant to this section and the juvenile offender is to perform community service work, the court shall assess the juvenile offender a fee of sixty cents (60¢) per hour for each hour of community service work the juvenile offender is to perform. This fee shall be remitted by the court to the state insurance fund for the purpose of securing worker’s compensation insurance for the juvenile offender performing community service. However, if a county is self-insured and provides worker’s compensation insurance for persons performing community service pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, then remittance to the state insurance fund is not required.
History.

I.C.,§ 16-1807A, as added by 1984, ch. 81, § 7, p. 148; am. 1994, ch. 233, § 3, p. 724; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 12, p. 65; am. 1996, ch. 260, § 1, p. 856; am. 2009, ch. 154, § 1, p. 449; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 10, p. 39; am. 2013, ch. 222, § 1, p. 522; am. 2014, ch. 345, § 1, p. 865; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 24, p. 379; am. 2016, ch. 51, § 1, p. 147.

§ 20-511A. Mental health assessments and plans of treatment.

A judge of any court shall order the department of health and welfare to submit appropriate mental health assessments and a plan of treatment for the court’s approval if at any stage of a proceeding under this chapter or the child protective act, chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code, a judge has reason to believe, based upon the record and proceedings of the court or upon an affidavit of a party, state or county agency or any person having physical custody of the juvenile or juvenile offender, that he or she:

Is suffering a substantial increase or persistence of a serious emotional disturbance as defined in section 16-2403, Idaho Code, which impairs his or her ability to comply with the orders and directives of the court, or which presents a risk to his or her safety or well-being or the safety of others; and

Such condition has not been adequately addressed with supportive services and/or corrective measures previously provided to the juvenile, or the juvenile’s needs with respect to the serious emotional disturbance are not being met or have not been met.

The court may convene a screening team consisting of representatives from the department of health and welfare, county probation, local school officials, teen early intervention specialists as provided for under section 16-2404A, Idaho Code, the department of juvenile corrections and/or other agencies or persons designated by the court to review the plan of treatment and provide written recommendations to the court. Parents and guardians of the juvenile or juvenile offender, if available, shall be included in the screening team and consulted with regard to the plan of treatment.

If the court, after receiving the mental health assessment and plan of treatment submitted by the department of health and welfare and any recommendations from the screening team, determines that additional information is necessary to determine whether the conditions set forth in subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section are present, or to determine an appropriate plan of treatment for the juvenile or juvenile offender, the court may order an evaluation and/or recommendations for treatment to be furnished by a psychiatrist, licensed physician or licensed psychologist, with the expenses of such evaluation and/or recommendations to be borne by the department of health and welfare.

If the court concludes that the conditions set forth in subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section are present, the plan of treatment, as approved by the court, shall be entered into the record as an order of the court. The department of health and welfare shall provide mental health treatment as designated by the approved plan of treatment. If in-patient or residential treatment is required as part of the plan of treatment, the court shall hold a hearing on whether to order such treatment unless the hearing is waived by the juvenile or juvenile offender and his or her parents or guardians. The court may order parents, legal guardians or custodians to adhere to the treatment designated in the plan of treatment. Representatives from the department of health and welfare, county probation, local school officials, teen early intervention specialists as provided for under section 16-2404A, Idaho Code, the department of juvenile corrections and/or other agencies or persons designated by the court shall attend case review hearings as scheduled by the court.
(5) All costs associated with assessment and treatment shall be the responsibility of the parents of the juvenile or juvenile offender according to their ability to pay based upon the sliding fee scale established pursuant to section 16-2433, Idaho Code. The financial obligation of the family shall be determined after consideration of all available payment and funding sources including title XIX of the social security act, as amended, all available third party sources, and parent resources according to any order for child support under chapter 10, title 32, Idaho Code. Services shall not be conditioned upon transfer of custody or parental rights.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-511A, as added by 2005, ch. 223, § 1, p. 699; am. 2007, ch. 309, § 4, p. 870; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 11, p. 39.

§ 20-512. Summons — Notice — Custody of juvenile.

After a petition shall have been filed and after such further investigation as the court may direct, and if the matter is set for hearing, the court shall issue a summons requiring the person or persons who have custody or control of the juvenile to appear personally and bring the juvenile before the court at a time and place stated; provided, however, if hearing is to be held, it shall be held not later than fifteen (15) days after the summons is issued unless the court should order on being shown cause that the time be extended. If the person so summoned shall be other than a parent or guardian of the juvenile, then the parent or guardian or both shall also be notified of the pendency of the case and of the time and place appointed for the hearing. Notice shall be given as hereinafter provided. A subpoena may be issued requiring the appearance of any other person whose presence is required by the juvenile, his guardian or any other person who, in the opinion of the judge, is necessary. If it appears the juvenile is in such condition or surroundings that his welfare requires that he be taken into custody immediately, the judge, as provided in section 20-516, Idaho Code, may order by endorsement upon the summons that the officer serving the same shall at once take the juvenile into custody and bring him before the court.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 8, p. 876; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 13, p. 65.

§ 20-513. Service of summons — Travel expenses.

Service of summons shall be made personally by delivery of an attested copy thereof to the person summoned; provided that if the judge is satisfied that it is impracticable to serve personally such summons or the notice provided for in the preceding section, he may order service by registered mail addressed to the last known address, or by publication thereof, or both. It shall be sufficient to confer jurisdiction if service is effected at least forty-eight (48) hours before the time fixed in the summons for the hearing. When publication is used the summons shall be published in two (2) consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper printed and published in the county; such newspaper to be designated by the court in the order for publication of the summons, and such publication shall have the same force and effect as though such person had been personally served with said summons. Service of summons, process or notice required by this act shall be made by the sheriff or a probation officer upon the request of the court and a return must be made by the sheriff on the summons showing that such service has been made. The judge may authorize payment of any necessary travel expenses incurred by any person summoned or otherwise required to appear at the hearing of any case coming within the purview of this act, and such expenses when approved by the judge shall be a charge upon the county, except that not more than five (5) witnesses on behalf of any parent or guardian may be required to attend such hearing at the expense of the county. The court may summon the appearance of any person whose presence is deemed necessary as a witness or possible resource for the care and treatment of the juvenile, including persons whom the juvenile or the family wishes to have present.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 9, p. 876; am. 1976, ch. 246, § 1, p. 845; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 14, p. 65.

§ 20-514. Representation at all stages of proceedings — Appointment of counsel — Waiver — Payment of cost of legal services.

A juvenile who is being detained by a law enforcement officer or who is under formal charge of having committed, or who has been adjudicated for commission of, an act, omission or status that brings him under the purview of this act, is entitled:

To be represented by an attorney to the same extent as an adult having his own counsel is so entitled pursuant to section 19-852, Idaho Code; and

To be provided with the necessary services and facilities of representation, including investigation and other preparation.

A juvenile who is entitled to be represented by an attorney under subsection (1) of this section is entitled:

To be counseled and defended at all stages of the matter beginning with the earliest time and including revocation of probation or recommitment;

To be represented in any appeal; and

To be represented in any other post-adjudication or review proceeding that the attorney or the juvenile considers appropriate, unless the court in which the proceeding is brought determines that it is not a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means would be willing to bring at his own expense and is therefore a frivolous proceeding.

A juvenile’s right to a benefit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is unaffected by his having provided a similar benefit at his own expense, or by his having waived it, at an earlier stage.

As early as possible in the proceedings, and in any event before the hearing of the petition on the merits, the juvenile and his parents, or guardian, shall be notified of their right to have counsel represent them. When it appears to the court that the juvenile or his parents or guardian desire counsel but are financially unable to pay for such legal services, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the juvenile and his parents or guardian; provided that in the event the court shall find that there is a conflict of interest between the interests of the juvenile and his parents or guardian, then the court shall appoint separate counsel for the juvenile, whether or not he or his parents or guardian are able to afford counsel, unless there is an intelligent waiver of the right of counsel by the juvenile, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, and the court further determines that the best interest of the juvenile does not require the appointment of counsel. Counsel appointed under this section shall initially receive reasonable compensation from the county and the county shall have the right to be reimbursed for the cost thereof by the parents or guardian as hereafter provided in this section.

Any waiver of the right to counsel by a juvenile under this act shall be made in writing, on the record and upon a finding by the court that:

The juvenile has been informed of the right to counsel and the dangers and disadvantages of self-representation; and

The waiver is intelligently made after consideration of the totality of the circumstances including, but not limited to:

The age, maturity, intelligence, education, competency and comprehension of the juvenile;
(ii) The presence of the juvenile’s parents or guardian;

The seriousness of the offense;

The collateral consequences of adjudication of the offense; and

Whether the interests of the juvenile and his parents or guardian conflict.

A juvenile shall not be permitted to waive the assistance to counsel in any of the following circumstances:

If the juvenile is under the age of fourteen (14) years;

In sentencing proceedings in which it has been recommended that the juvenile be committed to the legal custody of the department of juvenile corrections;

In proceedings in which the juvenile is being adjudicated for commission of a crime of a sexual nature;

In proceedings in which the juvenile is being adjudicated for commission of a felony;

In hearings upon a motion to waive jurisdiction under the juvenile corrections act pursuant to section 20-508, Idaho Code;

In hearings upon a motion to examine the juvenile to determine if he is competent to proceed pursuant to section 20-519A, Idaho Code; or

In recommitment proceedings.

Upon the entry of an order finding the juvenile is within the purview of this act, the parents, spouse or other person liable for the support of the juvenile, or the estates of such persons, and the estate of such juvenile, may be required by the court to reimburse the county for all or a portion of the cost of those legal services rendered to the juvenile by counsel appointed pursuant to this section that are related to the finding that the juvenile is within the purview of this act, unless the court finds such persons or estate to be indigent as defined in section 19-851(c), Idaho Code, and the requirement would impose a manifest hardship on those persons responsible for the juvenile or the estates. The current inability of those persons or entities to pay the reimbursement shall not, in and of itself, restrict the court from ordering reimbursement.

The prosecuting attorney of each county may, on behalf of the county, recover payment or reimbursement, as the case may be, from each person or estate who is liable for the payment or reimbursement of the cost of court appointed counsel for the juvenile, as provided in subsection (7) of this section. In the event such payment or reimbursement is not made upon demand by the prosecuting attorney, suit may be brought against such persons by the prosecuting attorney within five (5) years after the date on which such counsel was appointed by the court.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1809A, as added by 1976, ch. 246, § 2, p. 845; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 15, p. 65; am. 2013, ch. 222, § 2, p. 522.

§ 20-515. Failure to obey summons, a contempt — Warrant.

If any person summoned as herein provided shall, without reasonable cause, fail to appear, he may be proceeded against for contempt of court. In case the summons cannot be served, or the parties served fail to obey the same, or in any case when it shall be made to appear to the judge that the service will be ineffectual, or that the welfare of the juvenile offender requires that he be brought forthwith into the custody of the court, a warrant or a capias may be issued for the parent, guardian or the juvenile offender.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 10, p. 876; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 16, p. 65; am. 1997, ch. 76, § 2, p. 158; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 12, p. 39.

§ 20-516. Apprehension and release of juveniles — Detention.

A peace officer may take a juvenile into custody, or a private citizen may detain a juvenile until the juvenile can be delivered forthwith into the custody of a peace officer, without order of the court:

When he has reasonable cause to believe that the juvenile has committed an act which would be a misdemeanor or felony if committed by an adult; or

When in the presence of a peace officer or private citizen the juvenile has violated any local, state or federal law or municipal ordinance; or

When there are reasonable grounds to believe the juvenile has committed a status offense. Status offenses are truancy, running away from or being beyond the control of parents, guardian, or legal custodian, alcohol age violations under section 18-1502(e), Idaho Code, and curfew violations. Status offenders shall not be placed in any jail facility but instead may be placed in juvenile shelter care facilities, except in the case of runaways, when there is a specific detention request from a foreign jurisdiction to hold the juvenile pending transportation arrangements, and a peace officer may, in his discretion, notify the parent, guardian or legal custodian. In the event of an alcohol age infraction under section 18-1502(e), Idaho Code, the status offense under this section shall be in addition to the infraction.

A peace officer may take a juvenile into custody upon a written order or warrant signed by a judge. The judge may issue the order or warrant after finding that there is reasonable cause to believe that the juvenile comes within the purview of this chapter. Such taking into custody shall not be deemed an arrest. Jurisdiction of the court shall attach from the time the juvenile is taken into custody. When an officer takes a juvenile into custody, he shall notify the parent, guardian or custodian of the juvenile as soon as possible. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, or unless it appears to the officer taking the juvenile into custody that it is contrary to the welfare of society or the juvenile, such juvenile shall be released to the custody of his parent or other responsible adult upon written promise, signed by such person, to bring the juvenile to the court at a stated time. Such written promise shall be submitted to the court as soon as possible. If such person shall fail to produce the juvenile as agreed, or upon notice from the court, a summons for such person may be issued by the court and a warrant may be issued for apprehension of the juvenile.

A juvenile taken into custody may be fingerprinted and photographed. Any fingerprints and photographs taken shall be forwarded as provided in subsection (8) of this section. If the court finds good cause it may order any fingerprints and photographs expunged.

When a juvenile is not released he shall be taken forthwith to the court or place of detention specified by the court and then not later than twenty-four (24) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, shall be brought before the court for a detention hearing to determine where the juvenile will be placed until the next hearing. Status offenders shall not be placed in any jail facility, but instead may be placed in juvenile shelter care facilities.

Parents of the juvenile;

Relatives of the juvenile;

Foster care;

Group care;

A juvenile detention center; or

Community-based diversion programs.

The person in charge of a detention center shall give immediate notice to the court that the juvenile is in his custody.

No juvenile shall be held in detention longer than twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, unless a petition has been filed and the court has signed the detention order.

As soon as a juvenile is detained by court order, his parents, guardian or legal custodian shall be informed by notice in writing on forms prescribed by the court that they may have a prompt hearing regarding release or detention.

A juvenile taken into detention for an offense shall be fingerprinted and photographed. Fingerprints and photographs taken of juveniles shall be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency and filed with the bureau of criminal identification of the Idaho state police which shall create a juvenile offender fingerprint file and enter the fingerprint data into the automated fingerprint identification system. If the court finds good cause it may order the fingerprints and photographs of the juvenile offender expunged.

Peace officers’ records of juveniles shall be kept separate from records of adults and shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

Placements may include, but are not limited to, the following:

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 11, p. 876; am. 1977, ch. 156, § 2, p. 399; am. 1982, ch. 126, § 1, p. 362; am. 1984, ch. 81, § 8, p. 148; am. 1990, ch. 213, § 11, p. 480; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 17, p. 65; am. 1995, ch. 49, § 1, p. 115; am. 1995, ch. 277, § 5, p. 925; am. 1996, ch. 259, § 1, p. 854; am. 1996, ch. 379, § 2, p. 1284; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 54, p. 1450; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 13, p. 39; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 25, p. 379; am. 2016, ch. 344, § 3, p. 987.

§ 20-516A. Juvenile pretrial supervision — Fees.

The board of county commissioners may establish a juvenile supervised pretrial release program to perform those functions as prescribed by the administrative district judge in each judicial district. The board of county commissioners may provide for juvenile supervised pretrial release services through employment of staff, contract, or any other process that will accomplish the purposes of this section. A board of county commissioners shall not be obligated to establish a juvenile supervised pretrial release program. Counties having established a juvenile supervised pretrial release program shall not be obligated to provide juvenile supervised pretrial release services beyond the funds generated by the fees collected and any additional funds that may be annually appropriated by the board of county commissioners.

The court may assess a monthly juvenile pretrial supervision fee that shall be an amount no more than the maximum monthly juvenile probation supervision fee set forth in section 20-520, Idaho Code, per month, or such lesser sum as determined by the administrative judge of the judicial district, against the juvenile offender placed on pretrial supervision. The juvenile pretrial supervision fee shall be paid to the clerk of the district court who shall deposit such fee into the county juvenile probation fund, which is hereby created, in each county or, at the option of the board of county commissioners, deposited in the county justice fund to be used for county juvenile probation services. Moneys from this fee may be accumulated from year to year and shall be expended exclusively for county juvenile pretrial supervision services and related purposes.

A juvenile shall not be required to pay the juvenile pretrial supervision fee authorized in subsection (2) of this section until after the entry of an order finding the juvenile offender is within the purview of this section.

The court may also order the juvenile to pay additional fees to cover the actual costs of electronic monitoring, alcohol testing, or drug testing if such monitoring or testing is a condition of the juvenile’s release. Such additional fees may be paid to the clerk of the court or directly to the provider of the service. If fees are paid to the clerk of the court, the clerk of the court shall pay such fees to the county treasurer and such fees shall be used exclusively to cover the costs for which the additional fees have been ordered.

Any unpaid juvenile pretrial supervision fee shall be considered a debt owed to the court and may be collected in the manner provided by law for the collection of such debts.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-516A, as added by 2020, ch. 281, § 2, p. 818.

§ 20-517. Detention accommodations.

The county commissioners shall provide a detention center for the detention of juvenile offenders to be conducted by the court, or, subject to the approval of the court, by other appropriate public agency, provided that such detention shall comply with the provisions of section 20-518, Idaho Code, or within the limits of funds provided by the county commissioners.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section, the county commissioners may enter into contracts or agreements with public or private agencies, individuals, other counties, or the department of juvenile corrections, which may include the expenditures of moneys outside the county boundaries. If the county in which the court is located has made an agreement with another governmental unit or agency located outside the county or the judicial district for the detention of juvenile offenders under this act, then any court in the county may order a juvenile offender detained outside of the county or outside of the judicial district in the detention center described in such agreement. All detention centers in this section shall be in compliance with section 20-518, Idaho Code, and IDAPA 05.01.02.

The county wherein any court has entered an order for the detention of a juvenile offender outside of the county or outside of the judicial district as provided by subsection (2) of this section shall pay all direct and indirect costs of the detention of the juvenile offender to the governmental unit or agency owning or operating the detention center in which the juvenile offender was detained. The amount of such cost may be determined by agreement between the county wherein the court entered the order of detention and the county or governmental unit or agency owning or operating such detention center.

All moneys appropriated by the state for the planning and design of regional detention centers shall be administered and distributed by the director of the department of administration for the planning and design of regional detention centers in accordance with the requirements or directives of such appropriation. In administering such moneys, the director of the department of administration shall consult with the designated county officials of every county involved or affected by a proposed regional detention center and shall abide by the decision of the designated representatives of each of the counties so involved or affected.

History.

1963, ch. 319, § 12, p. 876; am. 1976, ch. 231, § 1, p. 819; am. 1978, ch. 57, § 1, p. 109; am. 1989, ch. 155, § 17, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 18, p. 65; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 14, p. 39; am. 2020, ch. 82, § 13, p. 174.

§ 20-518. Standards for detention.

The following shall be minimum standards for the detention of juveniles provided for in section 20-517, Idaho Code:

Juvenile detention centers must be so constructed and/or maintained as to keep juveniles segregated from adult offenders with there to be no contact as to sight and/or sound between the two (2) classes. Those juveniles being treated as adult offenders pursuant to section 20-508 or 20-509, Idaho Code, may be housed in a juvenile detention center if so ordered by the court. Such juveniles may be housed in the general juvenile population without sight and sound separation if it is determined by the detention administration that the safety and security of the other juveniles would not be at risk.

Juvenile detention centers must provide supervision and observation of juveniles sufficient to protect the physical and mental health of the detainees.

Juveniles held in detention must be provided with at least three (3) adequate and nutritional meals per day.

Juveniles held in detention must have access to reading materials on a regular and systematic basis. Detained juveniles may receive books, newspapers and periodicals from any source including delivery to the detention center by family members, subject to the right of detention authorities to inspect and remove dangerous or harmful materials. Detention authorities may forbid the introduction into holding quarters of obscene books or periodicals.

A visiting program shall be established in juvenile detention centers which will allow for family visits to each juvenile for at least two (2) hours each week.

The juvenile detention center shall meet the standards and rules set forth in IDAPA 05.01.02 and IDAPA 11.11.02.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the minimum standards set forth herein shall not apply to any person who attains his or her eighteenth birthday prior to beginning or while in detention. When such person attains his or her eighteenth birthday, he or she shall be transferred from juvenile detention to the county jail.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1812A, as added by 1978, ch. 57, § 2, p. 109; am. 1984, ch. 190, § 1, p. 439; am. 1989, ch. 155, § 18, p. 371; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 19, p. 65; am. 2000, ch. 111, § 1, p. 248; am. 2011, ch. 7, § 1, p. 19; am. 2012, ch. 19, § 15, p. 39.

§ 20-519. Evidentiary hearing.

If the juvenile denies the allegations in the petition, the court shall conduct a full evidentiary hearing, in the manner prescribed by the Idaho juvenile rules. The juvenile shall have the right to call witnesses on his own behalf. A record shall be made in all proceedings connected with the case and shall be preserved in the event of appeal. If at the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing the court finds the juvenile to come within the purview of the act, the court shall so rule, and then shall set the matter down for sentencing, or may, in the interest of time, hold a sentencing hearing at the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing if all information necessary to the disposition of the case is available at the time.

When a juvenile, other than the juvenile against whom the petition has been filed, is summoned as a witness in any hearing under this act, notwithstanding any other statutory provision, parents, a counselor, a friend or other person having a supportive relationship with the juvenile shall, if available, be permitted to remain in the courtroom at the witness stand with the juvenile during the juvenile’s testimony unless, in written findings made and entered, the court finds that the juvenile’s constitutional right to a fair trial will be unduly prejudiced.

History.

I.C.,§ 16-1813, as added by 1984, ch. 81, § 9, p. 148; am. 1989, ch. 54, § 1, p. 70; am. and redesig. 1995, ch. 44, § 20, p. 65.

§ 20-519A. Examination of juvenile — Competency — Appointment of psychiatrists, licensed psychologists or evaluation committee — Hospitalization — Report.

At any time after the filing of a delinquency petition, a party may request in writing, or the court on its own motion may order, that the juvenile be examined to determine if the juvenile is competent to proceed. The request shall state the facts in support of the request for a competency examination. If, based upon the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the court determines that there is good cause to believe that the juvenile is incompetent to proceed, then the court shall stay all proceedings and appoint at least one (1) examiner who shall be a qualified psychiatrist or licensed psychologist, or shall order the department of health and welfare to designate, within two (2) business days, at least one (1) examiner who shall be a qualified psychiatrist or licensed psychologist, to examine and report upon the mental condition of the juvenile. If there is reason to believe the basis for the juvenile’s incompetency is due to a developmental disability, the court shall appoint an evaluation committee as defined in section 66-402, Idaho Code, or shall order the department of health and welfare to designate, within two (2) business days, an evaluation committee, to examine and report upon the mental condition of the juvenile. The county shall be responsible for the cost of such evaluation subject to any reimbursement by the parents or other legal guardian of the juvenile. The court may order the parents or other legal guardian of the juvenile, unless indigent, to contribute to the costs of such examination in an amount to be set by the court after due notice to the parent or other legal guardian and the opportunity to be heard.

A juvenile is competent to proceed if he or she has:

A sufficient present ability to consult with his or her lawyer with a reasonable degree of rational understanding;

A rational and factual understanding of the proceedings against him or her; and

The capacity to assist in preparing his or her defense.

Within three (3) business days of the appointment or designation of an examiner or an evaluation committee pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the examiner or evaluation committee shall determine the best location for the examination. The examination shall be conducted on an outpatient basis unless the court specifically finds that hospitalization or confinement of the juvenile for evaluation of competency is necessary, the juvenile is currently hospitalized in a psychiatric hospital or the juvenile is detained. The court may order the juvenile be confined to a hospital or other suitable facility, including detention as defined in section 20-502, Idaho Code, after a hearing to determine whether such confinement is necessary. Any such confinement shall be for the purpose of examination and shall be for a period not exceeding ten (10) days from the date of admission to the hospital or other suitable facility. The court, upon request, may make available to the examiner or the evaluation committee any court records relating to the juvenile.
(4) The examiner or evaluation committee may employ any method of examination that is accepted by the examiner’s profession for the examination of juveniles alleged not to be competent, provided that such examination shall, at a minimum, include formal assessments of the juvenile in each of the following domains:

Cognitive functioning;

Adaptive functioning;

Clinical functioning;

Comprehension of relevant forensic issues; and

Genuineness of effort.

No statements of the juvenile relating to the alleged offense shall be included in the report unless such statements are relevant to the examiner or evaluation committee’s opinion regarding competency.

(5) If at any time during the examination process, the examiner has reason to believe that the juvenile’s alleged incompetency may be the result of a developmental disability and the matter has not already been referred to an evaluation committee for review, the examiner shall immediately notify the court. The court shall appoint an evaluation committee, or shall order the department of health and welfare to designate, within two (2) business days, an evaluation committee, to examine and report upon the mental condition of the juvenile. Conversely, if at any time during the examination process an evaluation committee has reason to believe the juvenile’s alleged incompetency is not the result of a developmental disability, the evaluation committee shall immediately notify the court so the examination can be completed by a qualified psychiatrist or licensed psychologist as set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The new examination and report shall be conducted within the time frames set forth in subsection (6) of this section.

(6) The examiner or evaluation committee shall submit a written report to the court within thirty (30) days of receipt of the appointment or designation. The report shall address the factors set forth in section 20-519B, Idaho Code. If the examiner or evaluation committee determines that the juvenile is incompetent to proceed, the report shall also include the following:

(a) The nature of the mental disease, defect, disability or other condition including chronological age that is the cause of the juvenile’s incompetency;

(b) The juvenile’s prognosis;

(c) Whether the examiner or evaluation committee believes the juvenile may be restored to competency and an estimated time period in which competence could be restored with treatment;

(d) If the juvenile may be restored to competency, the recommendations for restoration shall be the least restrictive alternative that is consistent with public safety;

(e) If the juvenile is not competent and there is no substantial probability that the juvenile can be restored to competency within six (6) months, a recommendation as to whether the juvenile meets the criteria set forth in section 16-2418, 66-329(11) or 66-406(11), Idaho Code, and identification of any other services recommended for the juvenile that are the least restrictive, community based and consistent with public safety; and

(7) The court, upon a finding of good cause, may alter the time frames for the designation of an examiner or evaluation committee, the completion of the examination or the completion of the report but shall ensure that the examination and competency determination occur as expeditiously as possible. The court may, upon a finding of good cause, vacate or continue the ninety (90) day restoration review hearing set forth in section 20-519C, Idaho Code.

(8) The report of the examination shall be filed in triplicate with the clerk of the court, who shall cause copies to be delivered to the prosecuting attorney and to counsel for the juvenile.

(9) If the examination cannot be conducted by reason of the unwillingness of the juvenile to participate, the report shall so state and shall include, if possible, an opinion as to whether such unwillingness of the juvenile was the result of age, mental disease, defect or disability and whether the examiner recommends that a second examiner be appointed to examine the juvenile.

History.

I.C.,§ 20-519A, as added by 2011, ch. 178, § 1, p. 505.